Hawaii statutes.
§343-1 Findings and purpose. The
legislature finds that the quality of humanity's environment is critical to
humanity's well being, that humanity's activities have broad and profound
effects upon the interrelations of all components of the environment, and that
an environmental review process will integrate the review of environmental
concerns with existing planning processes of the State and counties and alert
decision makers to significant environmental effects which may result from the
implementation of certain actions. The legislature further finds that the
process of reviewing environmental effects is desirable because environmental
consciousness is enhanced, cooperation and coordination are encouraged, and
public participation during the review process benefits all parties involved
and society as a whole.

It is the purpose of this chapter to establish
a system of environmental review which will ensure that environmental concerns
are given appropriate consideration in decision making along with economic and
technical considerations. [L 1979, c 197, §1(1); am L 1983, c 140, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next